Illinois, session 104th, HB3740.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. Exchange of property. The Director of the 5Department of Natural Resources, on behalf of the State of 6Illinois, is authorized to exchange certain real property in 7Peoria County, Illinois, with Thomas E. Heinz and Andrea L. 8Heinz. The property being exchanged is referred to as Parcel 1 9owned by the State and Parcel 2 owned by Thomas E. Heinz and 10Andrea L. Heinz. The parcels are specifically described as 11follows:  12PARCEL 1: 13    A part of the Southeast Quarter of Section Twenty-six 14    (26), Township Ten (10) North, Range Six (6) East of the 15    Fourth Principal Meridian, Peoria County, Illinois, more 16    particularly described as follows:17    Commencing at the Southeast corner of the Southeast 18    Quarter of Section Twenty-six (26); thence South 19    89°-45'-18" West (bearings are based on the Illinois State 20    Plane Coordinate System, NAD83, West Zone 1202), along the 21    South line of the Southeast Quarter of said Section 26, 22    643.50 feet to the point of beginning of the tract to be 23    described; from the point of beginning, thence South   HB3740 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 10954 JRC 21036 b1    89°-45'-18" West, 68.99 feet to the Northwest corner of a 2    0.713 acre tract; thence North 00°-14'-42" West, 30.00 3    feet; thence North 68°-19'-33" East, 133.12 feet; thence 4    South 34°-41'-18" West, 95.92 feet to the point of 5    beginning. Said tract containing 0.105 acre more or less. 6PARCEL 2:7    A part of the Southeast Quarter of Section Twenty-six 8    (26), Township Ten (10) North, Range Six (6) East of the 9    Fourth Principal Meridian, Peoria County, Illinois, more 10    particularly described as follows:11    Commencing at the Southeast corner of the Southeast 12    Quarter of said Section Twenty-six (26); thence South 13    89°-45'-18" West (bearings are based on the Illinois State 14    Plane Coordinate System, NAD83, West Zone 1202), along the 15    South line of the Southeast Quarter of said Section 26, 16    643.50 feet; thence North 34°-41'-18" East, 95.92 feet to 17    the point of beginning of the tract to be described: from 18    the point of beginning, thence continuing North 19    34°-41'-18" East, 107.83 feet to the West line of the 20    former Jubilee to Kickapoo Road; thence North 89°-45'-18" 21    East, 34.24 feet to the centerline of said former Jubilee 22    to Kickapoo Road; thence South 15°-43'-39" East along said 23    centerline, 47.48 feet; thence South 68°-19'-33" West, 24    116.73 feet to the point of beginning; said tract 25    containing 0.098 acre more or less.    HB3740 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 10954 JRC 21036 b1    Section 10. Consideration. The consideration for this 2exchange is that each party receives one of the parcels of real 3property in the exchange for the other that has mutual 4advantages for both parties. Each party is responsible for any 5and all title costs associated with the property each 6receives. Each party shall execute and deliver to the other 7party a quitclaim deed to the parcel that each is receiving in 8the exchange.  9    Section 15. The conveyance of Parcel 1 as authorized by 10Section 5 is made subject to existing public utilities, 11existing public roads, and any and all reservations, 12easements, encumbrances, covenants, and restrictions of 13record. 14    Section 20. Filing of title documents. The Director of the 15Department of Natural Resources shall obtain a certified copy 16of the portions of this Act containing the title, the enacting 17clause, the effective date, Section 5 containing the land 18descriptions of the property to be exchanged, and this Section 19within 60 days after its effective date and shall record the 20certified document in the Recorder's Office in the county in 21which the land is located. 22    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 23becoming law.